Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that, because many mental health practitioners are not regulated in this state, anyone may offer mental health services by using an unrestricted title and that there is no means for identifying qualified practitioners, for enforcing professional standards, or for holding such practitioners accountable for their actions. As a result, the Legislature determines that, in the interest of consumer protection and for the protection of public health, safety, and welfare, individuals should be provided a means by which they can be assured that their selection of a mental health practitioner is based on sound criteria and that the activities of those persons who by any title may offer or deliver therapeutic mental health services should be regulated.

The purpose of licensing mental health practitioners is to provide for an omnibus title for such persons and to provide for associated certification of social workers, master social workers, professional counselors, marriage and family therapists, and art therapists.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,295;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 721;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 3.